Montana, session 2025, LC1599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 13-1-301, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-1-301. Election administrator. (1) The county clerk and recorder of each county is the election
administrator unless the governing body of the county designates another official or appoints an election
administrator.
(2) The election administrator is responsible for the administration of all procedures relating to
registration of electors and conduct of elections, shall keep all county records relating to elector registration and
elections, and is the primary point of contact for the county with respect to the statewide voter registration list
and implementation of other provisions of applicable federal law governing elections.
(3) The election administrator may appoint a deputy election administrator for each political
subdivision required to hold elections."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Retroactive applicability -- applicability. (1) [This act] applies
retroactively, within the meaning of 1-2-109, to positions designated or appointed as election administrator by
the governing body of the county before [the effective date of this act].
(2) [This act] applies to positions designated or appointed as election administrator by the
governing body of the county on or after [the effective date of this act].

- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****